Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-1844
Municipality; duty to create commission; failure; effect.

Within ninety days after a municipality becomes subject to the Civil Service Act, it shall be the duty of the governing body of such municipality subject to such act to create a civil service commission, as provided in section 19-1827, and the failure upon the part of such governing body to do so shall be a violation of the Civil Service Act and shall be punishable as such.

Laws 1943, c. 29, § 19, p. 137;

R.S.1943, § 19-1819;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-1819;

Laws 1985, LB 372, § 23.